en: Furniture > Outdoor Furniture > Outdoor Seating > Outdoor Chairs: Adirondack Chairs; Club Chairs; Folding Chairs; Outdoor Bar & Counter Chairs; Outdoor Dining Chairs; Rocking Chairs; Sling Chairs; Swing Chairs
ru: Мебель > Уличная мебель > Уличная мебель для сидения > Уличные кресла и стулья: Кресла Адирондак; Кресла для отдыха; Складные стулья; Уличные барные и полубарные стулья; Уличные обеденные стулья; Кресла-качалки; Стулья-шезлонги; Кресла-качели
cs: Nábytek > Zahradní nábytek > Venkovní sedací nábytek > Venkovní židle: Křesla Adirondack; Klubové židle/křesla; Skládací židle; Venkovní barové a pultové židle; Venkovní jídelní židle; Houpací židle; Skládací houpací židle/křesla; Houpací židle/křesla
zh-CN: 家具 > 户外家具 > 室外座椅 > 户外座椅: 阿迪朗达克椅; 俱乐部椅; 折叠椅; 户外吧台椅和高脚椅; 户外餐椅; 摇椅; 吊床躺椅; 秋千椅
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Zunanje pohištvo > Zunanji sedeži > Zunanji stoli: Stoli Adirondack; Klubski stoli; Zložljivi stoli; Zunanji stoli za pult in točilni pult; Zunanji jedilni stoli; Gugalniki; Stoli z mrežasto podlogo; Gugalni stoli
el: Έπιπλα > Έπιπλα εξωτερικού χώρου > Υπαίθρια καθίσματα > Καρέκλες εξωτερικού χώρου: Καρέκλες Adirondack; Καρέκλες κλαμπ; Πτυσσόμενες καρέκλες; Καρέκλες μπαρ και πάγκου εξωτερικού χώρου; Καρέκλες τραπεζαρίας εξωτερικού χώρου; Κουνιστές καρέκλες; Καρέκλες με ιμάντες; Κρεμαστές καρέκλες
de: Möbel > Gartenmöbel > Gartensitzmöbel > Gartenstühle: Adirondack-Sessel; Clubstühle; Klappstühle; Outdoor-Bar- & Tresenstühle; Outdoor-Esszimmerstühle; Schaukelstühle; Campingstühle; Wippstühle
nb: Møbler > Utendørsmøbler > Sittemøbler utendørs > Utestoler: Adirondack-stoler; Klubbstoler; Sammenleggbare stoler; Bar- og benkestoler for utendørsbruk; Spisestoler for utendørsbruk; Gyngestoler; Slyngestoler; Svingstoler
ja: 家具 > 屋外用家具 > 屋外用ベンチ・椅子 > 屋外用椅子: アディロンダックチェア; クラブチェア; 折りたたみ椅子; アウトドアバー・カウンターチェア; アウトドアダイニングチェア; ロッキングチェア; スリングチェア; ブランコ型ハンギングチェア
pl: Meble > Meble zewnętrzne > Siedzenia ogrodowe > Krzesła ogrodowe: Fotele Adirondack; Krzesła Klubowe; Krzesła składane; Ogrodowe hokery i krzesła barowe; Ogrodowe krzesła jadalniane; Fotele bujane; Krzesła rozkładane; Fotele wiszące
hr-HR: Namještaj > Vanjski namještaj > Vanjski namještaj za sjedenje > Vanjske stolice: Adirondack stolice; Klupske stolice; Sklopive stolice; Vanjske barske i šankovske stolice; Vanjske blagovaonske stolice; Stolice za njihanje; Kamping stolice; Viseće fotelje
bg-BG: Мебели > Градински мебели > Места за сядане на открито > Градински столове: Дървени градински кресла; Клубни столове; Сгъваеми столове; Градински бар столове и столове за плот; Градински столове за хранене; Люлеещи се столове; Брезентови столове; Столове тип „люлка“
ro-RO: Mobilier > Mobilier de exterior > Scaune de exterior > Scaune de terasă: Scaune Adirondack; Scaune de club; Scaune pliante; Scaune de bar și tejghea pentru exterior; Scaune de luat masa pentru exterior; Balansoare; Scaune pentru terasă; Scaune tip leagăn
es: Mobiliario > Mobiliario de exterior > Asientos de exterior > Sillas de exterior: Sillas Adirondack; Sillones club; Sillas plegables; Sillas de bar y mostrador para exteriores; Sillas de comedor para exteriores; Mecedoras; Tumbonas; Sillas de columpio
hu: Bútor > Kültéri bútorok > Kültéri ülőhelyek > Kültéri székek: Adirondack székek; Klubszékek; Összecsukható székek; Kültéri bár- és pultszékek; Kültéri étkezőszékek; Ringatószékek; Heverőszékek; Hintaszékek
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > เฟอร์นิเจอร์กลางแจ้ง > ที่นั่งกลางแจ้ง > เก้าอี้สนาม: เก้าอี้แอดิรอนแดค; เก้าอี้สโมสร; เก้าอี้พับ; เก้าอี้บาร์และเคาน์เตอร์กลางแจ้ง; เก้าอี้ทานข้าวกลางแจ้ง; เก้าอี้โยก; เก้าอี้สลิง; เก้าอี้สวิง
sv: Möbler > Utomhusmöbler > Sittmöbler för utomhusbruk > Utomhusstolar: Adirondack-stolar; Klubbstolar; Fällbara stolar; Bar- & köksöstolar för utomhusbruk; Matstolar för utomhusbruk; Gungstolar; Slingstolar; Hängstolar
fi: Huonekalut > Ulkokalusteet > Ulkoistuimet > Ulkotuolit: Adirondack-tuolit; Nahkatuolit; Taittuvat tuolit; Ulkokäyttöiset baari- ja saareketuolit; Puutarhapöydän tuolit; Keinutuolit; Kokoontaitettavat tuolit; Riipputuolit
zh-TW: 家具 > 戶外家具 > 戶外座椅 > 戶外椅: 阿迪朗達克椅; 俱樂部沙發椅; 折疊椅; 戶外吧台與中島椅; 戶外餐椅; 搖椅; 輕便躺椅; 鞦韆椅
ko: 가구 > 야외용 가구 > 야외용 좌석 > 옥외용 의자: 애디론댁 의자; 낮고 팔걸이가 두꺼운 안락의자; 접이식 의자; 야외용 바 및 카운터 의자; 야외용 다이닝 의자; 흔들의자; 슬링 체어; 그네 의자
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Mobiliário de exterior > Assentos de exterior > Cadeiras de exterior: Cadeiras Adirondack; Cadeiras de clube; Cadeiras dobráveis; Cadeiras de bar e balcão de exterior; Cadeiras de jantar de exterior; Cadeiras de baloiço; Cadeiras de estilingue; Cadeiras de balanço
pt-BR: Móveis > Móveis para exteriores > Assentos para exteriores > Cadeiras para exteriores: Cadeiras Adirondack; Cadeiras de clube; Cadeiras dobráveis; Cadeiras de bar e balcão para área externa; Cadeiras de jantar para área externa; Cadeiras de balanço; Cadeiras de lona; Cadeiras balanço
da: Møbler > Havemøbler > Udendørs siddepladser > Havestole: Adirondack-stole; Klubstole; Klapstole; Udendørs bar- og køkkenø-stole; Udendørs spisebordsstole; Gyngestole; Slyngestole; Gyngestole
sk-SK: Nábytok > Exteriérový nábytok > Vonkajšie sedenie > Exteriérové stoličky: Záhradné kreslá Adirondack; Klubové kreslá; Skladacie stoličky; Vonkajšie barové a pultové stoličky; Vonkajšie jedálenské stoličky; Hojdacie kreslá; Plátenné lehátka; Hojdacie kreslá
it: Arredamento > Arredi per esterno > Mobili-sedie da esterno > Sedie da esterno: Sedie Adirondack; Sedie da club; Sedie pieghevoli; Sedie da bar e da bancone da esterno; Sedie da pranzo da esterno; Sedie a dondolo; Sedie sling; Sedie a dondolo
vi: Đồ gỗ > Đồ gỗ ngoài trời > Ghế ngồi ngoài trời > Ghế ngoài trời: Ghế thư giãn adirondack; Ghế câu lạc bộ; Ghế xếp; Ghế quầy bar & quầy bếp ngoài trời; Ghế ăn ngoài trời; Ghế bập bênh; Ghế địu; Ghế xích đu
nl: Meubelen > Buitenmeubelen > Buitenzitjes > Buitenstoelen: Adirondack-stoelen; Clubstoelen; Standaard klapstoelen; Bar- en counterstoelen voor buiten; Eetkamerstoelen voor buiten; Schommelstoelen; Slingstoelen; Buitenschommelstoelen
fr: Meubles > Meubles de jardin > Sièges d’extérieur > Chaises d’extérieur: Chaises Adirondack; Fauteuils Club; Chaises pliantes; Chaises et tabourets de bar pour l’extérieur; Chaises de salle à manger d’extérieur; Fauteuils à bascule; Fauteuils à drapé; Chaises à bascule
tr: Mobilyalar > Bahçe Mobilyaları > Bahçe Koltukları > Bahçe Sandalyeleri: Adirondack sandalyeler; Kulüp Sandalyeleri; Katlanır Sandalyeler; Dış mekan bar ve tezgah sandalyeleri; Dış mekan yemek sandalyeleri; Sallanan Sandalyeler; Askılı Sandalyeler; Salıncak Sandalyeler
lt-LT: Baldai > Lauko baldai > Lauko sėdėjimo baldai > Lauko kėdės: „Adirondack“ kėdės; Klubo kėdės; Sulankstomos kėdės; Lauko baro ir prekystalio kėdės; Lauko valgomojo kėdės; Supamosios kėdės; Kabančio audinio kėdės; Pakabinamos kėdės